Illinois, session 104th, HB235.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Tax Refund Anticipation Loan Reform Act is 5amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 177/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the Tax 8Refund Anticipation Loan Reform Act.9(Source: P.A. 97-849, eff. 1-1-13.)